Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-203 Power to contract. (a)
Any person of competent legal capacity may contract for insurance.

(b) A minor of the age of fifteen years or
more, as determined by the nearest birthday, shall be deemed to be competent
to:

(1) Contract for any form of life insurance or
accident and health or sickness insurance on the minor's own life or body, for
the minor's own benefit or for the benefit of the minor's father, mother,
spouse, child, brother, sister, or grandparent;

(2) Surrender, make loans upon, or assign any
insurance issued at any time upon the minor's life or body, subject to the
provisions of the policy;

(3) Give a valid discharge for any benefit accruing
or for any money payable under the contract; and

(4) Exercise any of the rights or privileges reserved
to the insured in and by any such policy of insurance;

except that such minor, not otherwise emancipated,
shall not be bound by any unperformed agreement to pay, by a promissory note or
otherwise, any premium on any such insurance contract.

(c) Where any form of life insurance or
accident and health or sickness insurance is issued at any time upon the life
or body of a minor, unless the policy shall otherwise provide, or unless all of
the premiums on the policy are paid by the minor, then until the minor has
reached the age of eighteen years, either or both parents of the minor, or in
the event of the death of one parent or the divorce of the parents and the
custody of the minor being awarded to one parent, then the surviving parent or
the custodial parent of the minor shall be authorized to:

(1) Surrender, make loans upon, or assign such
insurance;

(2) Give a valid discharge for any benefit accruing
or for money payable under the contract; and

(3) Exercise any of the rights or privileges reserved
to the insured in and by any such policy of insurance without the order or
intervention of any court, or the appointment of a legal guardian.

No insurer shall have any responsibility for or
be required to see to the application of the proceeds paid in accordance with
this section.

(d) The ownership of or property interest of
the insured in any policy of life insurance issued on the life of any minor
shall be deemed to be in the minor and shall continue in the minor except if:

(1) The policy shall have lapsed or shall have been
surrendered, assigned, or otherwise acted upon in accordance with the
provisions of this section while the minor is under the age of eighteen years;

(2) After the insured shall have reached the age of
eighteen years, the policy shall have lapsed or shall have been surrendered,
assigned, or otherwise acted upon by the insured; or

(3) At the time of issuance, the policy of insurance
shall provide otherwise. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2002, c 155, §39]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next